Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,117
Insurance.

(MBCA 8.57) A corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of an individual who is a director or officer of the corporation, or who, while a director or officer of the corporation, serves at the corporation's request as a director, officer, member, partner, trustee, employee, or agent of another domestic or foreign corporation, limited liability company, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan, or other entity, against liability asserted against or incurred by the individual in that capacity or arising from his or her status as a director or officer, whether or not the corporation would have power to indemnify or advance expenses to the individual against the same liability under sections 21-2,110 to 21-2,119.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 117;

Laws 2016, LB794, § 9.